New Jersey, session 221, S3067.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.    For the purposes of P.L.    , c.   (C.     ) (pending before Legislature as this bill): Interstate motor vehicle information network means an interstate network used for the exchange of law enforcement, criminal justice, and public safety-related information. "Personal information" means any information that identifies an individual, which information may include an individual's photograph, social security number, driver identification number, name, address, or telephone number. Speed control device means an integrated system or device utilizing a camera, or a multiple camera system, and vehicle sensors that is capable of automatically producing a recorded image of an alleged violation that shows a motor vehicle traveling at or above a predetermined speed and a portion of the motor vehicle sufficient to clearly identify the motor vehicle. Traffic control signal monitoring system means an integrated system or device utilizing a camera, or a multiple camera system, and vehicle sensors that is capable of automatically producing a recorded image of an alleged violation that shows a motor vehicle unlawfully entering and continuing through an intersection controlled by a traffic control signal and a portion of the motor vehicle sufficient to clearly identify the motor vehicle. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1966, c.73 (C.39:5D-1 et seq.) and P.L.1983, c.46 (C.39:5F-1 et seq.), neither the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, nor any other State agency, shall disclose the personal information of drivers with drivers licenses issued by this State to another state or an interstate motor vehicle information network for the purpose of imposing or collecting a fine resulting from an alleged violation committed in another state that was captured by a traffic control signal monitoring system or a speed control device located in that state. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.